Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 163A.005 is amended to read:
163A.005. As used in ORS 163A.005 to 163A.235:
(1) “Another United States court”  means a federal court, a military court, the tribal court of a
federally recognized Indian tribe or a court of:
(a) A state other than Oregon;
(b) The District of Columbia;
(c) The Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;
(d) Guam;
(e) American Samoa;
(f) The Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands; or
(g) The United States Virgin Islands.
(2) “Attends” means is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis.
(3)(a) “Correctional facility” means any place used for the confinement of persons:
(A) Charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined under a court order.
(B) Found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for  having committed an act that
if committed by an adult would constitute a crime.
(b) “Correctional facility”  applies to a state hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient
facility only as  to persons detained therein charged with or convicted of a crime, or detained therein
after being found guilty except for insanity  under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or responsible except for
insanity under ORS 419C.411.
(4) “Institution of higher education” means  a public or private educational institution that pro-
vides a program of post-secondary education.
(5) “Sex crime” means:
(a) Rape in any degree;
(b) Sodomy in any degree;
(c) Unlawful sexual penetration in any degree;
(d) Sexual abuse in any degree;
(e) Incest with a child victim;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 1
(f) Using a child in a display of sexually explicit conduct;
(g) Encouraging child sexual abuse in any degree;
(h) Transporting child pornography into the state;
(i) Paying for viewing a child’s sexually explicit conduct;
(j) Compelling prostitution;
(k) Promoting prostitution;
(L) Kidnapping in the first degree if the victim was under 18 years of age;
(m) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor;
(n) Sexual misconduct if the offender is at least 18 years of age;
(o) Possession of materials depicting sexually explicit conduct of a child in the first degree;
(p) Kidnapping in the second  degree if the victim was under 18 years of age, except by a parent
or by a person found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court;
(q) Online sexual corruption of  a child in any degree if the offender reasonably believed the
child to be more than five years younger than the offender;
(r) Luring a minor, if:
(A) The offender reasonably believed the minor or, in the case  of a police officer or agent of a
police officer posing as a minor, the purported minor to be more than five years younger than  the
offender or under 16 years of age; and
(B) The court designates in the judgment that the offense is a sex crime;
(s) Sexual assault of an animal;
(t) Public indecency or private indecency,  if the person has a prior conviction for a crime listed
in this subsection;
(u) Trafficking in persons as described in ORS 163.266 (1)(b) or (c);
(v) Purchasing sex with a  minor if the court designates the offense as a sex crime pursuant to
ORS 163.413 (3)(d), or the offense is the defendant’s  second or subsequent conviction under ORS
163.413 (3)(b)(B);
(w) Invasion of personal privacy in the first degree, if the court designates the offense as a  sex
crime pursuant to ORS 163.701 (3);
(x) Sexual abuse by fraudulent representation;
(y) Abuse of a corpse in the first degree as described in ORS 166.087 (1)(a);
[(y)] (z)  Any attempt to  commit any of the crimes listed in paragraphs (a) to [ (x)] (y)  of this
subsection;
[(z)] (aa)  Burglary, when committed with intent to commit any of the  offenses listed in para-
graphs (a) to [ (x)] (y)  of this subsection; or
[(aa)] (bb) Criminal conspiracy if the offender agrees with one or more persons to engage in or
cause the performance of an offense listed in paragraphs (a) to [ (x)] (y)  of this subsection.
(6) “Sex offender” means a person who:
(a) Has been convicted of a sex crime;
(b) Has been found guilty except for insanity of a sex crime;
(c) Has been convicted in another United States court of a crime:
(A) That would constitute a sex crime if committed in this state; or
(B) For which the person would have to register as a sex  offender in that court’s jurisdiction,
or as required under federal  law, regardless of whether the crime would constitute a sex crime in
this state; or
(d) Is described in ORS 163A.025 (1).
(7) “Works” or “carries on a vocation” means full-time or part-time employment for more than
14 days within  one calendar year whether financially compensated, volunteered or for the purpose
of governmental or educational benefit.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 163A.115 is amended to read:
163A.115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) A person who is a sexually violent dangerous offender under ORS 137.765:
(a) Must be classified as a level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3); and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 2
(b) Is not eligible for relief from the obligation to report as  a sex offender or reclassification
as a level two sex offender under  ORS 163A.100 (2), pursuant to a petition filed under ORS 163A.125.
(2) A person who has been convicted or found guilty except for insanity of one of  the following
offenses is not eligible for relief from the obligation to report  as a sex offender pursuant to a peti-
tion filed under ORS 163A.125 (1):
(a) Rape in the first degree;
(b) Sodomy in the first degree;
(c) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree;
(d) Kidnapping in the first degree as described in ORS 163.235 (1)(e) or when  the victim is under
18 years of age; or
(e) Burglary in the first degree when committed with the intent to commit  any of the offenses
listed in ORS 163A.005 (5)(a) to [ (x)] (y) .
(3) A person classified as a level three sex  offender under section 7 (2)(b), chapter 708, Oregon
Laws 2013, is not eligible for relief from the obligation to report as a sex  offender pursuant to a
petition filed under ORS 163A.125 (1).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 802.179 is amended to read:
802.179. (1) The Department of Transportation, upon request or as required by law, shall disclose
personal information from a motor vehicle record to a government  agency for use in carrying out
its governmental functions.
(2) The department  shall disclose personal information from a motor vehicle record for use in
connection with matters of motor vehicle or driver safety and theft, motor vehicle  emissions, motor
vehicle  product  alterations, recalls or advisories, performance monitoring of motor vehicles and
dealers by motor vehicle manufacturers, and  removal of nonowner records from the original owner
records of motor vehicle manufacturers to carry out the purposes of  any of the following federal
Acts:
(a) The Automobile Information Disclosure Act.
(b) The Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Saving Act.
(c) The National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966.
(d) The Anti-Car Theft Act of 1992.
(e) The Clean Air Act.
(3)(a) If the department determines that a business is a legitimate business,  the department shall
disclose personal information to the business for use in the normal course of business in:
(A) Verifying the accuracy of personal information submitted to the business; or
(B) Correcting personal information submitted to the business, but only in order to:
(i) Prevent fraud;
(ii) Pursue legal remedies against the individual who submitted the personal information; or
(iii) Recover a debt from, or satisfy a security interest against, the individual.
(b) The department  shall adopt rules specifying the kind of information that the department will
accept as evidence that a business is a legitimate business.
(4) The department shall disclose personal information to:
(a) An  attorney, a financial institution as defined in ORS chapter 706 or a collection agency
registered under ORS 697.031 for use in connection with a civil, criminal,  administrative or arbi-
tration proceeding in any  court, government agency or self-regulatory body. Permissible uses of
personal information  under this paragraph include, but are not limited to, service of process, inves-
tigation in anticipation of litigation and the execution and enforcement of judgments and orders.
(b) A process server acting as an agent for an individual for use in serving documents  in con-
nection with an existing civil, criminal, administrative or arbitration proceeding, or  a judgment, in
any court, government agency  or self-regulatory body. Nothing in this paragraph limits the activities
of a process server when acting  as an agent for an attorney, collection agency or like person or for
a government agency.
(5) The department shall disclose personal information other than names to a researcher for use
in researching health  and educational questions and providing statistical reports, as long as the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 3
personal information  is not published, redisclosed or used to contact individuals. The department
may disclose information under this  subsection only for research sponsored by an educational in-
stitution or a health research institution.
(6) The department shall disclose personal information to an  insurer, an insurance support or-
ganization or a self-insured entity in connection with  claims investigation activities, antifraud ac-
tivities, underwriting or rating.
(7) The department shall  disclose personal information regarding ownership or other financial
interests in a vehicle to a person who is required by the state or  federal Constitution, a statute or
an ordinance  to give notice to another person concerning the vehicle. Personal information disclosed
under this subsection may be used only for giving the required notice. Persons authorized to receive
personal information under this subsection include, but are not limited to:
(a) Tow companies;
(b) Persons who have or are entitled to have liens on the vehicle; and
(c) Persons taking an action that could affect ownership rights to the vehicle.
(8) The department shall disclose personal  information to any private security professional cer-
tified under ORS 181A.870, to be used for  the purpose of determining ownership of vehicles parked
in a place over  which the private security professional, acting within the scope of the professional’s
employment, exercises control.
(9) The department shall disclose personal information to the employer of  an individual who
holds commercial driving privileges, or the insurer of the  employer, to obtain or verify information
about the individual.
(10) The department shall disclose personal information to the operator  of a private toll facility
for use in collecting tolls.
(11) The department may  not disclose personal information for bulk distributors of surveys,
marketing materials or solicitations except as provided in  this subsection. The department shall
implement methods and procedures to ensure:
(a) That individuals are offered an opportunity to request that personal  information about
themselves be disclosed to bulk distributors; and
(b) That the  personal information provided by the department will be used, rented or sold solely
for bulk distribution of surveys, marketing materials and solicitations.
(12) The department shall disclose personal information to a  person who requests the informa-
tion if the requester provides the department with written permission  from the individual whose
personal information is requested. The written permission from the individual must be notarized.
(13) The department shall disclose personal information to a person who is in the  business of
disseminating such information under the following conditions:
(a) In addition to any other requirements under the contract executed pursuant  to paragraph (b)
of this subsection, the  person requesting the information must file a performance bond with the de-
partment in the amount of $25,000. The bond must be executed in favor of the  State of Oregon and
its form is subject to approval by the Attorney General.
(b) The disseminator shall enter into a contract with the department. A contract under  this
paragraph shall contain at least the following provisions:
(A) That the disseminator will not reproduce or distribute the personal information  in bulk but
only in response to an individual record inquiry.
(B) That the disseminator will provide the personal  information only to a person or government
agency authorized to receive the information under this section and only if the person  or govern-
ment agency has been authorized by the department to receive the information.
(C) That the disseminator will have a method of ensuring that the disseminator can delay for a
period of up to two days the giving of personal information to a requester who is not a subscriber.
(14) The department shall disclose personal information to representatives  of the news media for
the gathering or dissemination of information related to  the operation of a motor vehicle or to
public safety.
(15) The department shall disclose personal information as provided in ORS 802.220 (5).
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 4
(16) The department shall adopt rules providing for the  release of personal information from
motor vehicle records to a person who has  a financial interest in the vehicle. Rules adopted under
this subsection may include, but need not be limited to, rules establishing procedures for  the de-
partment to verify the financial interest of the person making the request for personal information.
(17) The department shall adopt rules providing for the  release of personal information from
motor vehicle records to a person who is injured by the unsafe operation of a vehicle or who owns
property that is damaged because of the unsafe operation of a vehicle.
(18) The department shall disclose personal  information to a private investigator licensed by any
licensing authority within the  State of Oregon, to be used for any purpose permitted under this
section. A licensed  private investigator requesting information must prove to the department that
the person has a corporate surety  bond, an irrevocable letter of credit issued by an insured insti-
tution as defined in ORS 706.008 or such other security as the Department of Public Safety Stand-
ards and Training may prescribe by rule in  the minimum amount of $5,000 or errors and omissions
insurance in the minimum amount of $5,000.
(19) The department shall disclose personal information to a procurement organization as de-
fined in ORS 97.953 for the purpose of facilitating the making of anatomical gifts under the  pro-
visions of ORS 97.955.
(20) The department, upon request, shall disclose personal information to  a humane
special agent as defined in ORS 181A.345.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 807.115 is amended to read:
807.115. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall retain a digital image of each photograph
and signature shown on a  driver license under the provisions of ORS 807.110 or an identification
card under ORS 807.400.
(2) The digital images of photographs may not be made  available to anyone other than law
enforcement officials and employees of the department acting in an official capacity.
(3) As used in this  section, “law enforcement official” includes a humane special agent
as defined in ORS 181A.345.
SECTION 4a. For the purpose of requesting a state or nationwide criminal records check
under ORS 181A.195, a humane investigation  agency, as defined in ORS 181A.340, may require
the fingerprints of a person who:
(1) Is employed or applying for employment by the agency; or
(2) Provides services or seeks to provide services to the agency as a contractor, vendor
or volunteer.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 243.706 is amended to read:
243.706. (1) A  public employer may enter into a written agreement with the exclusive represen-
tative of an appropriate bargaining unit setting forth a grievance  procedure culminating in binding
arbitration or any  other dispute resolution process agreed to by the parties. As a condition of
enforceability, any arbitration  award that orders the reinstatement of a public employee or other-
wise relieves the  public employee of responsibility for misconduct shall comply with public policy
requirements as clearly defined in statutes  or judicial decisions including but not limited to policies
respecting sexual harassment or sexual misconduct, unjustified and  egregious use of physical or
deadly force and serious criminal misconduct, related to work. In addition, with respect  to claims
that a grievant should be reinstated or otherwise relieved  of responsibility for misconduct based
upon the public employer’s alleged previous differential treatment  of employees for the same or
similar conduct, the arbitration award must conform to the following principles:
(a) Some misconduct is so egregious that no employee can reasonably rely on past  treatment for
similar offenses as a justification or defense to discharge or other discipline.
(b) Public managers have a right to change disciplinary  policies at any time, notwithstanding
prior practices, if such managers give reasonable advance notice to affected  employees and the
change does not otherwise violate a collective bargaining agreement.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 5
(2) In addition to subsection (1) of this section, a public employer may enter into  a written
agreement with the exclusive representative of its employees providing that a labor dispute over
conditions and terms of a contract may be resolved through binding arbitration.
(3) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, when an arbitration proceeding involves al-
leged misconduct by a sworn law enforcement officer of any  law enforcement agency, as those terms
are defined in ORS  [ 131.930] 243.812, and the arbitrator makes a finding that misconduct has oc-
curred consistent with the law  enforcement agency’s finding of misconduct or, if applicable, con-
sistent with a finding of misconduct by a civilian or community oversight board, agency or review
body, the arbitration award may not order any disciplinary action that differs from the disciplinary
action imposed by the law enforcement agency or the civilian  or community oversight board, agency
or review body, if the disciplinary  action imposed by the law enforcement agency, or the civilian
or community oversight board, agency or  review body was in accordance with the uniform standards
adopted by  the Commission on Statewide Law Enforcement Standards of Conduct and Discipline
established under ORS 243.812.
(4) In an arbitration proceeding under  this section, the arbitrators, or a majority of the
arbitrators, may:
(a) Issue subpoenas on their own motion or at the request of a party to the proceeding to:
(A) Compel the attendance of a witness properly served by either party; and
(B) Require from  either party the production of books, papers and documents the arbitrators find
are relevant to the proceeding;
(b) Administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses; and
(c) Adjourn a hearing from day to day, or for a longer time, and from place to place.
(5) The  arbitrators shall promptly provide a copy of a subpoena issued under this section to each
party to the arbitration proceeding.
(6) The  arbitrators issuing a subpoena under this section may rule on objections to the issuance
of the subpoena.
(7) If a person fails to comply with a subpoena issued under this section or if a witness refuses
to testify on a matter on which the witness may be  lawfully questioned, the party who requested the
subpoena or seeks the testimony may apply to the arbitrators for an order authorizing the party to
apply to the circuit court of any county to enforce the  subpoena or compel the testimony. On the
application of the attorney of record  for the party or on the application of the arbitrators, or a
majority of the arbitrators, the court may require the person or  witness to show cause why the
person or witness should not be punished for contempt of  court to the same extent and purpose as
if the proceedings were pending before the court.
(8) Witnesses appearing pursuant to subpoena, other than parties or officers or  employees of the
public employer, shall receive fees and mileage as prescribed by law for witnesses  in ORS 44.415 (2).
(9) As used  in this section, “civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body”
means a board, an agency or a body:
(a) Designated by a municipality or a law enforcement agency in performing duties  related to
investigating allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies and practices; or
(b) Created  to oversee disciplinary matters concerning law enforcement officers pursuant to a
city charter or ordinance for which a  measure that included the question of whether to establish the
board, agency or body was referred to and approved by the people  of the city at an election held
on or after July 1, 2020.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.808 is amended to read:
243.808. (1) For purposes  of an arbitration proceeding under ORS 243.706 concerning alleged
misconduct by a law enforcement officer:
(a) A law enforcement agency or, if  applicable, a civilian or community oversight board, agency
or review body, has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence to show that:
(A) The officer engaged in the alleged misconduct; and
(B) Any disciplinary action taken  against the officer was with just cause, as defined in ORS
236.350.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 6
(b) In determining the reasonableness of a  disciplinary action imposed by a law enforcement
agency or a civilian or community oversight board, agency or  review body, including whether the
level of discipline  is appropriate, an arbitrator shall uphold the disciplinary action unless the
arbitrator finds that the disciplinary action is arbitrary and capricious.
(c) When the imposed disciplinary action is termination of employment, an arbitrator  may not
set aside or reduce the imposed  disciplinary action if setting aside or reducing the disciplinary
action is inconsistent with  the public interest in maintaining community trust, enforcing a higher
standard of  conduct for law enforcement officers and ensuring an accountable, fair and just disci-
plinary process.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 243.706 (1),  and subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, in car-
rying out an arbitration proceeding  described under ORS 243.706 (3), the Employment Relations
Board shall appoint a person from a list of qualified, indifferent and unbiased  persons to serve as
the arbitrator of the proceeding. The board shall submit to each  of the parties subject to the pro-
ceeding the list of persons who may serve as arbitrators.
(b) After the board has selected a person from the list to serve as the arbitrator  of the pro-
ceeding, each of the parties subject  to the proceeding is entitled to one opportunity to object to the
board’s proposed arbitrator. If a party objects  to the proposed arbitrator, the board shall select an
alternative person to  serve as the arbitrator. If the other party objects to the alternative person,
the board shall make a final selection from the names remaining on the list as  to who shall serve
as the arbitrator of the proceeding.
(3) The requirements described in this section are not subject to collective bargaining.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body” means  a board, an agency
or a body:
(A) Designated by a municipality or a law enforcement agency  in performing duties related to
investigating allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies and practices; or
(B) Created to oversee disciplinary matters concerning  law enforcement officers pursuant to a
city charter or ordinance for which a  measure that included the question of whether to establish the
board, agency or body was referred to and  approved by the people of the city at an election held
on or after July 1, 2020.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” and “law enforcement officer”  have the meanings given those
terms in ORS [ 131.930] 243.812.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 243.809 is amended to read:
243.809. (1) For matters concerning alleged misconduct by a law  enforcement officer, the fol-
lowing shall make determinations regarding the  alleged misconduct and impose disciplinary action
in response  to such determinations in accordance with the uniform standards adopted by the Com-
mission on Statewide Law Enforcement Standards of Conduct and Discipline under ORS 243.812:
(a) A law enforcement agency located anywhere in this state.
(b) An arbitrator who serves in an arbitration proceeding described under ORS 243.706 (3).
(c) A civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body.
(2) The requirements described in this section are not subject to collective bargaining.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Civilian or community oversight board, agency or review body” means  a board, an agency
or a body:
(A) Designated by a municipality or a law enforcement agency  in performing duties related to
investigating allegations of officer misconduct or reviewing police policies and practices; or
(B) Created to oversee disciplinary matters concerning  law enforcement officers pursuant to a
city charter or ordinance for which a  measure that included the question of whether to establish the
board, agency or body was referred to and  approved by the people of the city at an election held
on or after July 1, 2020.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” and “law enforcement officer”  have the meanings given those
terms in ORS [ 131.930] 243.812.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 7
SECTION 8.  ORS 192.672 is amended to read:
192.672. (1) A state board  or commission may meet through telephone or other electronic means
in accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding  ORS 171.072 or 292.495, a member of a state board or commission who
attends a meeting through telephone  or other electronic means is not entitled to compensation or
reimbursement for expenses for attending the meeting.
(b) A  state board or commission may compensate or reimburse a member, other than a member
who is a member of the Legislative Assembly, who attends a  meeting through telephone or other
electronic means as provided in ORS 292.495 at the discretion of the board or commission.
(3)(a) A state board or commission that meets through telephone  or other electronic means in
accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.705 shall record and promptly publish  the meeting on a publicly
accessible website or hosting service, so that members of the public may without charge:
(A) Observe a recording of the meeting if the meeting was conducted through  videoconferencing
technology; or
(B) Listen to a recording of the meeting if the meeting  was conducted through teleconferencing
technology that did not include video capabilities.
(b) The requirement that a meeting be published under this subsection does not apply to that
portion of a state board or commission meeting that was lawfully held in executive  session under
ORS 192.660 or other law , or to hearings of the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison  Super-
vision or the Psychiatric Security Review Board .
(c) The requirement to record and publish meetings  under this subsection applies to any state
board or commission that is within the executive department, as  defined in ORS 174.112, and whose
members are subject to Senate confirmation under ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 10. A court shall, at the request of a party to a prosecution for  driving while
suspended or revoked in violation of ORS 811.175 or 811.182, admit into evidence data  pre-
pared or recorded by the Department of Transportation that details  the suspension of a
person’s driving privileges.
SECTION 11. (1) The  Oregon Public Defense Commission Lawyer Trust Account is es-
tablished as a trust account  in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund. Interest earned  by the trust account shall be credited to the trust account. All moneys
in the trust account are appropriated continuously to and shall be used by  the Oregon Public
Defense Commission  for the sole purpose of making payments on behalf of clients of the
commission.
(2) The trust account established by this  section consists of moneys received by the
commission on behalf of clients and temporarily credited to the account prior  to the dis-
tribution of the moneys on behalf of clients.
(3) The commission may establish subaccounts within the trust  account when the com-
mission determines that subaccounts are necessary or desirable.
(4) The commission shall transfer interest earned on moneys deposited  in the trust ac-
count or in any of its subaccounts according to rules of professional  conduct adopted pur-
suant to ORS 9.490 governing lawyer trust accounts.
(5) Moneys in the trust account are not subject to allotment under ORS 291.234  to
291.260.
SECTION 12. The amendments to ORS 192.672 by section 8 of this 2024 Act apply  to
hearings conducted before, on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 13. The amendments to ORS 163A.005, 163A.115,  243.706, 243.808 and 243.809 by
sections 1, 2 and 5 to 7 of this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 14.  ORS 811.700 is amended to read:
811.700. (1) A driver of a vehicle who knows or has reason to believe that the driver’s vehicle
was involved in a collision commits the offense of failure  to perform the duties of a driver when
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 8
property is damaged if the driver’s vehicle is involved in a collision that results in  damage to
property and the driver does not perform duties required under any of the following:
(a) Immediately stop the driver’s vehicle at the scene  of the collision or as close to the scene
of the collision  as possible and reasonably investigate what the driver’s vehicle struck. Every stop
required under this paragraph should be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.
(b) If  the driver’s vehicle has been involved in a collision that results only in damage to a ve-
hicle that is driven  or attended by any other person, the driver shall perform all of the following
duties:
(A) Remain at the scene of the collision until the driver has fulfilled all of the  requirements
under this paragraph.
(B) Give to the other driver or passenger:
(i) The driver’s name and address, the name and address  of the owner of the driver’s vehicle and
the name and address of any other occupants of the driver’s vehicle; and
(ii) If the driver’s  vehicle is a motor vehicle, the registration number of the motor vehicle, the
name of the insurance carrier covering  the motor vehicle, the insurance policy number of the in-
surance policy insuring the motor vehicle and the phone number of the insurance carrier.
(C) Upon request and  if available, exhibit and give to the occupant of or person attending any
vehicle damaged the number of any document issued as evidence of  driving privileges granted to the
driver.
(c) If the driver’s vehicle has been involved in a collision resulting in damage to any vehicle that
is unattended, the driver shall perform all the following duties:
(A) Locate the operator or owner of the unattended vehicle and notify the operator  or owner
of:
(i) The driver’s name and address and the name and address of the owner of the vehicle that
struck the unattended vehicle; and
(ii) If the driver’s vehicle is a motor vehicle, the registration number of the  motor vehicle, the
name of the insurance carrier covering the motor vehicle, the insurance  policy number of the in-
surance policy insuring the motor vehicle and the phone number of the insurance carrier; or
(B) Leave in a conspicuous place in the unattended vehicle a written notice giving:
(i) The driver’s name and address and the name and address of the owner of the vehicle that
struck the unattended vehicle and a statement of the circumstances of the collision; and
(ii) If the driver’s  vehicle is a motor vehicle, the registration number of the motor vehicle, the
name of the insurance carrier covering  the motor vehicle, the insurance policy number of the in-
surance policy insuring the motor vehicle and the phone number of the insurance carrier.
(d) If the driver’s vehicle has been involved in a collision resulting only  in damage to fixtures
or property legally upon or adjacent  to a highway, the driver shall perform all of the following du-
ties:
(A) Take reasonable steps to notify the  owner or person in charge of the property of the colli-
sion and of the  driver’s name and address, the vehicle owner’s name and address and, if the driver’s
vehicle  is  a motor vehicle, the registration number of the motor vehicle, the name of the insurance
carrier covering the motor vehicle, the insurance policy number of  the insurance policy insuring the
motor vehicle and the phone number of the insurance carrier.
(B) Upon request and if available, exhibit  any document issued as evidence of driving privileges
granted to the driver.
(e) If the driver discovers only after leaving  the scene of the collision that the driver has
reason to believe that the  driver’s vehicle [ may have been ] was involved in a collision  that re-
sulted in damage to another vehicle, fixture or property, the driver shall as soon as reasonably
possible make a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(2) As used in this section, “reason to believe” means that  the driver is aware of a circumstance
that would cause a reasonable person to be aware of a substantial and unjustifiable risk  that the
driver’s vehicle has been in a collision.  The risk must be of such nature or degree that failure to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 9
be aware of it constitutes a gross deviation from the standard of  care that a reasonable person
would observe in the situation.
(3) The offense described  in this section, failure to perform the duties of a driver when property
is damaged, is a Class A misdemeanor and  is applicable [ on any premises open to the public ],
notwithstanding ORS 801.020 (9), to a collision that results in  damage to property caused by
the motion of a vehicle or its load that occurs on any  highway or premises open to the
public, or any premises adjacent to a highway or premises open to the public .
SECTION 15.  ORS 811.705 is amended to read:
811.705. (1) A driver of a vehicle who knows or has reason to believe that the driver’s vehicle
was involved in a collision commits the offense of failure to  perform the duties of a driver to injured
persons if the  driver’s vehicle has been in a collision that results in injury or death to a person and
the driver does not perform all of the following duties:
(a) Immediately stop the driver’s vehicle at the scene  of the collision or as close to the scene
of the collision  as possible and reasonably investigate what the driver’s vehicle struck. Every stop
required under this paragraph should be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.
(b) Remain at the scene of the  collision until the driver has fulfilled all of the requirements
under this subsection.
(c) Give to the other driver or a  surviving passenger or any person not a passenger who is in-
jured as a result of the collision:
(A) The driver’s name and address, the name and address of  the owner of the driver’s vehicle
and the name and address of any other occupants of the driver’s vehicle; and
(B) If the driver’s vehicle is  a motor vehicle, the registration number of the motor vehicle, the
name of the insurance carrier covering  the motor vehicle, the insurance policy number of the in-
surance policy insuring the motor vehicle and the phone number of the insurance carrier.
(d) Upon request and if available, exhibit and give to the persons  injured and to the occupant
of or person attending any vehicle damaged the number of  any document issued as official evidence
of driving privileges granted to the driver.
(e) Render to  any person injured in the collision reasonable assistance, including the conveying,
or the making of arrangements for the conveying, of an injured  person to a physician, surgeon or
hospital for medical or  surgical treatment, if it is apparent that such treatment is necessary or if
such conveying is requested by any injured person.
(f) Remain  at the scene of a collision until a police officer has arrived and has received the re-
quired information,  if all persons required to be given information under paragraph (c) of this sub-
section  are  killed in the collision or are unconscious or otherwise incapable of receiving the
information. The requirement  of this paragraph to remain at the scene of a collision until a police
officer arrives does not apply to a driver who needs immediate medical care, who  needs to leave the
scene in order to secure medical care for another person injured  in the collision or who needs to
leave the scene in order to report the collision to the authorities, as long as the driver  who leaves
takes reasonable steps to return to the scene or to contact the nearest police officer.
(g) If the driver discovers only after leaving the  scene of the collision that the driver has
reason to believe  that the  driver’s vehicle [ may have been ] was involved in a collision that re-
sulted in injury or death to any person,  the driver shall as soon as reasonably possible make a good
faith effort to comply with the requirements of this subsection. The driver shall  immediately contact
9-1-1 and  provide to the dispatcher any requested information described in paragraph (c) of this
subsection and the location and approximate time of the collision.
(2) As used in this section, “reason to believe” means that  the driver is aware of a circumstance
that would cause  a reasonable person to be aware of a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the
driver’s vehicle has been in a collision. The risk must be of such  nature or degree that failure to
be aware of it constitutes a  gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person
would observe in the situation.
(3)(a) Except  as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the offense described in
this section, failure to perform the duties of a  driver to injured persons, is a Class C felony and is
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 10
applicable , [ on any premises open to the public ] notwithstanding ORS 801.020 (9), to any place a
collision is caused by the motion of a vehicle or its load that results in injury or death .
[(b) Failure to perform the duties of a driver to injured persons is a Class B felony if a person
suffers serious physical injury as defined in ORS 161.015 or dies as a result of the collision. ]
(b) If a person suffers serious physical injury  as defined in ORS 161.015 or dies as a result
of the collision, the offense described in this section, failure to  perform the duties of a driver
to injured persons, is a Class B felony, and is applicable, notwithstanding ORS  801.020 (9), to
any place a collision is caused by the motion of a vehicle or its load.
SECTION 16.  ORS 811.710 is amended to read:
811.710. (1) A driver of a vehicle who knows or has reason to believe that the driver’s vehicle
was involved in a collision commits the offense of failure to perform the duties  of a driver when an
animal is injured if the driver’s vehicle injures  or kills a domestic animal and the driver does not
perform all of the following duties:
(a) Immediately stop the driver’s vehicle at the scene of  the collision or as close to the scene
of the collision as possible and reasonably investigate what the driver’s vehicle struck.  Every stop
required under this paragraph should be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.
(b) Make a reasonable effort to determine the nature of the animal’s injuries.
(c) Give reasonable attention to the animal.
(d) Immediately report the injury to the animal’s owner.
(e) If unable to contact the owner of the animal, notify a police officer.
(f) If the driver discovers only after leaving the scene of the collision that the driver has rea-
son to believe that the  driver’s vehicle [ may have been ] was involved in a collision that injured
or killed a domestic animal,  the driver shall as soon as reasonably possible make a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of this section.
(2) The requirements under this section for a  driver to stop and attend an injured animal depend
on the traffic hazards then existing.
(3) As used in this section, “reason to believe” means that  the driver is aware of a circumstance
that would cause  a reasonable person to be aware of a substantial and unjustifiable risk that the
driver’s vehicle has been in a collision. The risk must be of such  nature or degree that failure to
be aware of it constitutes a  gross deviation from the standard of care that a reasonable person
would observe in the situation.
(4) The offense described in this section, failure to perform the duties of a driver when an animal
is injured, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 811.720 is amended to read:
811.720. [ (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any accident occurring on a
highway or upon premises open to the public resulting in injury or death to any  person is subject to
the reporting requirements under the following sections: ]
(1) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and notwithstanding ORS 801.020
(9), any place a collision is caused by the motion of a vehicle or its  load that results in injury
or death to any person, the collision is subject  to the reporting requirements under the fol-
lowing sections:
(a) The reporting requirements for drivers under ORS 811.725.
(b) The reporting requirements for occupants of vehicles in [ accidents] collisions under  ORS
811.735.
(c) The reporting requirements for owners of vehicles under ORS 811.730.
[(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this  section, an accident occurring on a highway or
upon premises open to the public resulting in  damage to the property of any person in excess of $2,500
is subject to the following reporting requirements: ]
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and notwithstanding ORS 801.020
(9), a collision caused by the motion of a vehicle or its load that  occurs on any highway or
premises open to the public, or any premises adjacent to a highway or premises open to the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 11
public, that results in damage to the property of any person in excess  of $2,500, is subject
to the reporting requirements under the following sections:
(a) The driver of a vehicle  that has more than $2,500 damage must report the [ accident] collision
in the manner specified under ORS 811.725.
(b) The owner of a  vehicle that has more than $2,500 damage must report the [ accident] collision
in the manner specified in ORS 811.730 and under the circumstances specified in ORS 811.730.
(c) If the property damage is to  property  other than a vehicle involved in the  [ accident]
collision, each driver involved in the [ accident] collision must report the [ accident] collision in the
manner specified under ORS 811.725 and each owner of a vehicle involved in the [ accident] collision
must report the [ accident] collision in the manner specified  in ORS 811.730 and under the circum-
stances specified in ORS 811.730.
(d) If a vehicle involved in the [ accident] collision is damaged to the extent that the vehicle must
be towed from  the scene of the [ accident] collision, each driver involved in the [ accident] collision
must report the [ accident] collision in the  manner specified under ORS 811.725 and each owner of
a vehicle involved in the  [ accident] collision  must report the [ accident] collision  in the manner
specified in ORS 811.730 and under the circumstances specified in ORS 811.730.
(3) The dollar amount specified in subsection (2)  of this section may be increased every five
years by the Department  of Transportation based upon any increase in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers,  West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics
of the United States Department of  Labor or its successor during the preceding 12-month period.
The amount determined under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest $100.
(4) The following are exempt from the reporting requirements of this section:
(a) Operators of snowmobiles, Class I all-terrain vehicles or Class III all-terrain vehicles.
(b) A law enforcement official acting  in the course of official duty if the [ accident] collision in-
volved a law enforcement  official performing a lawful intervention technique or a law enforcement
official and a person acting during the commission of a criminal offense. As  used in this paragraph:
(A) “Law enforcement official”  means a person who is responsible for enforcing the criminal
laws of this state or a political subdivision of this state and who is employed or volunteers:
(i) As a peace officer commissioned by a city, university that has established a  police depart-
ment under ORS 352.121 or 353.125, port, school district, mass transit  district, county or county
service district authorized to provide law enforcement services under ORS 451.010;
(ii) With the Department of State Police  or the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of
Justice;
(iii) As an  investigator of a district attorney’s office, if the investigator is certified as a peace
officer in this state; or
(iv) As an authorized tribal police officer as defined in ORS 181A.940.
(B) “Lawful intervention technique” means a method by which one motor vehicle causes,  or at-
tempts to cause, another motor vehicle to stop.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 811.725 is amended to read:
811.725. (1) The driver of a vehicle commits the  offense of driver failure to report [ an accident ]
a collision if the driver does any of the following:
(a) Is driving any vehicle that is involved in [ an accident ] a collision  required to be  reported
under ORS 811.720 and does not, within 72 hours of the [ accident] collision, complete a report of the
[accident] collision in a form approved by the Department of Transportation  and submit the report
to the department.
(b) Is driving a  vehicle that is involved in [ an accident ] a collision  and does not submit to the
department any report  required by the department that is other than or in addition to the reports
required by this section. The department may request a supplemental report  if in the opinion of the
department the original report is insufficient.
(c) Is driving any vehicle that is involved in [ an accident ] a collision  required to  be reported
under ORS 811.720 and does not, within 72  hours of the [ accident] collision, provide proof of com-
pliance with financial responsibility requirements to the department, in a form furnished  by the de-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 12
partment, that at the time of the [ accident] collision the person was in compliance with the financial
responsibility requirements.
(2) The proof of compliance with financial responsibility  required under this section is subject
to the prohibitions and penalties for false certification under ORS 806.050.
(3) The reports described under this section are subject to the provisions of ORS  802.220 and
802.240 relating to  the use of such reports after submission. Exemptions from requirements to pro-
vide proof of compliance with financial responsibility are established under ORS 806.020.
(4) A  driver may be required to file additional [ accident] collision reports with a city as provided
under ORS 801.040.
(5) The offense described in this section, driver failure to report [ an accident ] a collision , is a
Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 19.  ORS 811.730 is amended to read:
811.730. (1) The owner of a vehicle  commits the offense of owner failure to report [ an accident ]
a collision if the owner does any of the following:
(a) If the person owns a vehicle that is involved in [ an accident ] a collision  that is required to
be reported under ORS 811.720 and all of the following apply:
(A) The [ accident] collision occurred while the vehicle was driven by someone other than  the
owner of the vehicle.
(B) The driver of the vehicle does not make [ an accident ] a collision  report as required under
ORS 811.725.
(C) The owner of the vehicle fails to report the  [ accident] collision  to the Department of
Transportation in a form specified  by the department as soon as the owner learns of the [ accident]
collision.
(b) If the person is the owner of a vehicle involved in [ an accident ] a collision  and the  person
does not make any additional reports the department may require.
(2) The offense described in this section, owner failure to report [ an accident ] a collision , is a
Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 20.  ORS 811.735 is amended to read:
811.735. (1) A  person commits the offense of failure of a vehicle occupant to make [ an accident ]
a collision report if:
(a) The person is an occupant, other than the driver, of a vehicle at a time when  the vehicle is
involved in [ an accident ] a collision  required to be reported under ORS 811.720;
(b) The driver of the vehicle is physically incapable of  making [ an accident ] a collision  report
required under ORS 811.725; and
(c) The occupant does not make the  [ accident] collision report or cause the [ accident] collision
report to be made.
(2) This section does not require an occupant of a vehicle who  is not a driver to provide proof
of compliance with financial responsibility requirements.
(3) The offense described in this section, failure  of a vehicle occupant to make [ an accident ] a
collision report, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 21.  ORS 811.740 is amended to read:
811.740. (1) A person commits the offense of giving a false [ accident] collision report if  the per-
son gives information  in any report required under ORS 811.725 or 811.730, knowing or having rea-
son to believe that such information is false.
(2) The offense  described in this section, giving a false [ accident] collision report, is a Class B
misdemeanor.
SECTION 22.  ORS 811.745 is amended to read:
811.745. [ (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, any accident occurring on a
highway or upon premises open to the public resulting in injury or death to any  person is subject to
the reporting requirements under the following sections: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 13
(1) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and notwithstanding ORS 801.020
(9), any place a collision is caused by the motion of a vehicle or its  load that results in injury
or death to any person, the collision is subject to:
(a) The reporting requirements for drivers under ORS 811.748.
(b) The reporting requirements for occupants of vehicles in [ accidents] collisions under  ORS
811.750.
[(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this  section, an accident occurring on a highway or
upon premises open to the public resulting in  damage to the property of any person in excess of $2,500
is subject to the following reporting requirements: ]
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, and notwithstanding ORS 801.020
(9), a collision caused by the motion of a vehicle or its load that  occurs on any highway or
premises open to the public, or any premises adjacent to a highway or premises open to the
public, that results in damage to the property of any person in excess  of $2,500, is subject
to the following:
(a) The driver of a vehicle  that has more than $2,500 damage must report the [ accident] collision
in the manner specified under ORS 811.748.
(b) If the property damage is  to  property other than a vehicle involved in the [ accident]
collision, each driver involved in the [ accident] collision must report the [ accident] collision in the
manner specified under ORS 811.748.
(c) If a vehicle involved in the [ accident] collision is damaged to the extent that the vehicle must
be towed from the scene of the [ accident] collision, each driver involved in the  [ accident] collision
must report the [ accident] collision in the manner specified under ORS 811.748.
(3) The dollar amount specified in subsection (2) of  this section may be increased every five
years by the Department of Transportation based upon any increase in the  Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau  of Labor Statistics
of the United States Department of Labor or its successor  during the preceding 12-month period.
The amount determined under this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest $100.
(4) The following are exempt from the reporting requirements of this section:
(a) Operators of snowmobiles and Class I, Class III and Class IV all-terrain vehicles.
(b) A law enforcement official acting in the course of official duty  if the [ accident] collision in-
volved  a  law enforcement official performing a lawful intervention technique or involved a law
enforcement official and a person acting during  the commission of a criminal offense. As used in this
paragraph:
(A) “Law enforcement official” means a person who is responsible for  enforcing the criminal
laws of this state or a political subdivision of this state and who is employed or volunteers:
(i) As a peace officer commissioned by a city, port, university that  has established a police de-
partment under ORS 352.121 or 353.125, school district, mass  transit district, county or service dis-
trict authorized to provide law enforcement services under ORS 451.010;
(ii) With the Department of State Police or the Criminal  Justice Division of the Department of
Justice; or
(iii) As an investigator of a district attorney’s office, if the investigator is certified as  a peace
officer in this state.
(B) “Lawful intervention  technique” means a method by which one motor vehicle causes, or at-
tempts to cause, another motor vehicle to stop.
(5) The reporting requirements under this  section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, the re-
porting requirements under ORS 811.720.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 811.750 is amended to read:
811.750. (1) A  person commits the offense of failure of a vehicle occupant to make [ an accident ]
a collision report if:
(a) The person is an occupant, other than the driver, of a vehicle at a time when  the vehicle is
involved in [ an accident] a collision required to be reported to a police officer or a law  enforcement
agency under ORS 811.745;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 14
(b) The driver of the vehicle is physically incapable of giving  notice to a police officer or a law
enforcement agency as required under ORS 811.748; and
(c) The occupant does not give  notice of the [ accident] collision immediately to a police officer
or a law enforcement agency by the quickest means available.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  a person does not commit the offense of fail-
ure of a vehicle occupant to make [ an accident ] a collision  report if:
(a) The [ accident] collision required to be reported  under ORS 811.745 results in a serious injury
or death; and
(b) The person gives notice of the [ accident] collision immediately to the emergency communi-
cations system by the quickest means available.
(3) The offense described in this section, failure of a  vehicle occupant to make [ an accident ] a
collision report, is a Class A traffic violation.
SECTION 24.  ORS 802.240 is amended to read:
802.240. (1) In all actions, suits or criminal proceedings when the  title to, or right of possession
of, any vehicle is involved, the record of title, as it appears in the  files and records of the Depart-
ment of Transportation, is prima facie evidence of ownership or right to possession of  the vehicle.
As used in this section, the record of title does not include records of salvage titles  unless the re-
cord itself is the salvage title. Proof of the ownership or right to possession of a vehicle shall  be
made by means of any of the following methods:
(a) The original certificate of title as provided under ORS 803.010.
(b) A copy, certified  by the department, of the title record of the vehicle as the record appears
in the files and records of the department.
(2) Extrinsic evidence of authenticity is not required as a condition  precedent to the admission
of a copy of a document relating to the privilege of any person to drive a motor vehicle  authorized
by law to be filed and actually filed in the records of the department if the copy  bears a seal pur-
porting to be that of  the department and is certified as a true copy by original or facsimile signature
of a person purporting to be an officer or employee of the department. This subsection applies to
copies of a data compilation in any form. Copies of documents certified in  accordance with this
subsection constitute prima facie evidence of the existence of the facts stated therein.
(3) A certified copy of a person’s driving record, as maintained by the department:
(a) May be admitted as evidence in any hearing or proceeding under ORS 813.200 to 813.270.
(b) Is prima facie evidence that the person named therein was duly  convicted of each offense
shown by the record.
(c) Is prima facie evidence that the person  named therein is participating in or has participated
in a driving under the influence of intoxicants  diversion program or in any similar alcohol or drug
rehabilitation program in this state or in any other jurisdiction if the record shows  that the person
has participated in such a program.
(4) Records and actions described  in this subsection shall not be referred to in any way or ad-
mitted into evidence or  be any evidence of the negligence or due care of any party at the trial of
any action at law to recover damages. This subsection applies to all of the following:
(a) The report required following [ an accident ] a collision .
(b) Any action taken by the department  to revoke or suspend a driver license or driver permit
or taken by the department under the financial responsibility requirements of the vehicle code  or
the findings, if any, of the department upon which such action of the department is based.
(c) Any deposit of security required under the financial responsibility requirements  of the vehi-
cle  code.
(5) Except  as provided in this subsection, the [ accident] collision reports filed with the depart-
ment under ORS  811.725, 811.730 or 811.735 shall be without prejudice to the individual filing the
report and no such report shall  be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of
[an accident ] a collision . The following uses are allowable under this subsection:
(a) The certificate issued by the department under ORS 802.220 to show whether  or not [ an ac-
cident] a collision  report has been made to the department shall be used solely to prove a  compli-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 15
ance or failure to comply with the requirements that the [ accident] collision report be made to the
department.
(b) [ An accident ] A collision  report  submitted under ORS 811.725 or 811.735 may be used in an
administrative hearing or an appeal  from such hearing to support any suspension of driving privi-
leges for:
(A) Failure to make reports required under ORS 811.725 or 811.735.
(B) Failure to comply with financial responsibility requirements or failure to comply with future
responsibility  filings.
(6) A photocopy, facsimile copy, digital or electronic copy of an application for perfection of a
security interest by notation on a title under ORS 803.097 that is certified  by the department is
proof of the date of perfection of the security interest unless the date is  invalid as provided under
ORS 803.097.
(7) A report filed by a physician or health care provider under  ORS 807.710 is confidential and
may not be admitted  as evidence in any civil or criminal action. A report described in this sub-
section may be used in an administrative hearing or an appeal from  an administrative hearing in
which an issue is the qualification of a person to operate a motor vehicle.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 811.748 is amended to read:
811.748. (1) The driver of a vehicle commits the  offense of driver failure to report [ an accident ]
a collision if the driver is driving any vehicle that is involved in [ an accident ] a collision  required
to be reported under ORS 811.745 and the driver, if physically capable,  does not give notice of the
[accident] collision  immediately  to a police officer or a law enforcement agency by the quickest
means available.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a driver does not commit the offense of  driver
failure to report [ an accident ] a collision  if:
(a) The [ accident] collision required to be reported  under ORS 811.745 results in a serious injury
or death; and
(b) The driver  gives notice of the [ accident] collision immediately to the emergency communi-
cations system by the quickest means available.
(3) The offense described in this section, driver failure to report [ an accident ] a collision , is a
Class A traffic violation.
SECTION 26. The amendments to  ORS 802.240, 811.700, 811.705, 811.710, 811.720, 811.725,
811.730, 811.735, 811.740, 811.745, 811.748 and 811.750 by sections 14 to 25 of this 2024 Act apply
to collisions occurring on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 27. The amendments to ORS 802.240, 811.700, 811.705,  811.710, 811.720 811.725,
811.730, 811.735, 811.740, 811.745, 811.748 and 811.750  by sections 14 to 25 of this 2024 Act be-
come operative January 1, 2025.
SECTION 28. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 16
Passed by Senate February 22, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1574 (SB 1574-A) Page 17